Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4310
Fineness, defined.

Fineness shall mean the percentage by weight of the material which will pass standard sieves of specified sizes to be determined by the director pursuant to section 2-4319.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 539, § 3.